Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2520
Personnel office; created; county personnel officer; board; members; costs of administering.

There is hereby created a personnel office in the office of the board of county commissioners, the executive head of which shall be the county personnel officer. In such office there shall be a personnel policy board consisting of six members with powers and duties provided in the County Civil Service Act. The board of county commissioners shall make appropriations from the general fund to meet the estimated costs of administering the act.

Laws 1974, LB 995, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 198, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 14.